Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-387.01
Evidence of insurance; display
as electronic image.

Evidence
of insurance may be displayed as an electronic image on an electronic device.
If a person displays evidence of insurance on an electronic device, the person
is not consenting for law enforcement to access other contents of the device.
Whenever a person presents an electronic device for purposes of evidence of
insurance, the person presenting the electronic device assumes liability for
any damage to the device.

Laws 2014, LB816, § 3.